Tennessee, session 114, SB0576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-2005(g), is amended by
inserting the following immediately preceding the language "The report must":
The division may submit the report on a more frequent basis.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0576
002476
- 1 -